Florida, session 2026, SB1532.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSection 366.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 32 read: 33 366.03âGeneral duties of public utility; transparency and 34 accountability.â 35 (1)âEach public utility shall furnish to each person 36 applying therefor reasonably sufficient, adequate, and efficient 37 service upon terms as required by the commission. A No public 38 utility is not shall be required to furnish electricity or gas 39 for resale except that a public utility may be required to 40 furnish gas for containerized resale. All rates and charges 41 made, demanded, or received by any public utility for any 42 service rendered, or to be rendered by it, and each rule and 43 regulation of such public utility, must shall be fair and 44 reasonable. A No public utility may not shall make or give any 45 undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any person or 46 locality, or subject the same to any undue or unreasonable 47 prejudice or disadvantage in any respect. 48 (2)âThe Legislature finds that transparency and 49 accountability in the form of clear reporting, accessible public 50 hearings, and strong disclosure standards bolster the public 51 trust in public utilities and ensure that decisions are made in 52 the best interest of all residents. The commission shall 53 implement measures to improve transparency and accountability by 54 providing, at a minimum, all of the following: 55 (a)âAt least one in-person public service hearing per every 56 250,000 customers, held in a reasonable location near those 57 customers, or at least one in-person public service hearing held 58 in each county where the public utility provides service, if the 59 county has fewer than 250,000 residents. 60 (b)âPublic access to information regarding the compensation 61 of the executive officers of each public utility providing 62 service, or the compensation of the executive officers of a 63 public utilityâs subsidiaries. 64 Section 2.âSection 366.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to 65 read: 66 366.041âRate fixing; adequacy of facilities as criterion; 67 cost recovery prohibitions.â 68 (1)âIn fixing the just, reasonable, and compensatory rates, 69 charges, fares, tolls, or rentals to be observed and charged for 70 service within this the state by any and all public utilities 71 under its jurisdiction, the commission is authorized to give 72 consideration, among other things, to the efficiency, 73 sufficiency, and adequacy of the facilities provided and the 74 services rendered; the cost of providing such service and the 75 value of such service to the public; the ability of the utility 76 to improve such service and facilities; and energy conservation 77 and the efficient use of alternative energy resources; provided 78 that a no public utility is not shall be denied a reasonable 79 rate of return upon its rate base in any order entered pursuant 80 to such proceedings. In its consideration thereof, the 81 commission has shall have authority, and it is shall be the 82 commissionâs duty, to hear service complaints, if any, that may 83 be presented by subscribers and the public during any 84 proceedings involving such rates, charges, fares, tolls, or 85 rentals; however, no service complaints may not shall be taken 86 up or considered by the commission at any proceeding proceedings 87 involving rates, charges, fares, tolls, or rentals unless the 88 utility has been given at least 30 daysâ written notice thereof, 89 and any proceeding may be extended, before prior to final 90 determination, for such period; further, an no order hereunder 91 is not shall be made effective until a reasonable time has been 92 given for the utility involved to correct the cause of service 93 complaints, considering the factor of growth in the community 94 and availability of necessary equipment. 95 (2)âThe power and authority herein conferred upon the 96 commission does shall not cancel or amend any existing punitive 97 powers of the commission but is shall be supplementary thereto 98 and must shall be construed liberally to further the legislative 99 intent that adequate service be rendered by public utilities in 100 this the state in consideration for the rates, charges, fares, 101 tolls, and rentals fixed by said commission and observed by such 102 said utilities under its jurisdiction. 103 (3)âThe term âpublic utilityâ as used herein means all 104 persons or corporations which the commission has the authority, 105 power, and duty to regulate for the purpose of fixing rates and 106 charges for services rendered and requiring the rendition of 107 adequate service. 108 (4)âAn No electric utility may not collect impact fees 109 designed to recover capital costs in initiating new service 110 unless the utility can demonstrate and the commission finds that 111 such fees are fair, just, and reasonable and are collected from 112 the ultimate utility customer of record at such time as or after 113 permanent electric service is provided. This prohibition does 114 shall not apply to underground electric distribution lines or 115 line extension charges collected pursuant to approved tariffs. 116 (5)âThe commission shall ensure that public utilities do 117 not recover any of the following costs from ratepayers, whether 118 as part of the proposed base rate costs, a rider, or other 119 charges: 120 (a)âMore than 50 percent of annual total compensation or of 121 expense reimbursement for commissioners. 122 (b)âTax penalties or fines issued against the public 123 utility. 124 (c)âInvestor-relations expenses. 125 (d)âAdvertising or public relations expenses that do not 126 directly relate to a purpose or program that is required or 127 authorized under law or commission rule or order. Such expenses 128 include any of the following: 129 1.âCommunications to promote the public utilityâs brand. 130 2.âExpenses related to lobbying or other activities meant 131 to influence the outcome of legislation. 132 (e)âOrganizational or membership dues, or other 133 contributions, to any organization, association, institution, 134 corporation, or other entity that engages in lobbying or similar 135 activities intended to influence the outcome of any local, 136 state, or federal legislation, ordinance, resolution, rule, 137 ballot measure, or other regulatory decision, including, but not 138 limited to, business or industry trade associations. 139 (f)âAny amount expended to compensate attorneys or 140 technical experts, who are not public utility company staff, to 141 prepare and litigate a general rate case filing. The commission 142 shall adopt rules for determining whether additional costs 143 associated with rate case filings are recoverable. 144 (6)(a)âIf the commission determines that a utility 145 improperly recovered costs pursuant to subsection (5), the 146 commission must order the utility to refund the amount 147 improperly recovered, plus interest, to customers. Upon such 148 determination, the commission may also assess a nonrecoverable 149 penalty against the utility. The penalty may not exceed the 150 greater of the following: 151 1.âThree times the amount of the expenditure made in 152 violation of paragraph (5)(a). 153 2.âA fine of $5,000 per violation of paragraph (5)(a) or 154 paragraph (5)(b), which may be inflation-adjusted annually. 155 (b)âIf the commission determines that a utility, or any of 156 its subsidiaries, has violated any provision of this section, 157 the commission may refer the case to the Attorney General. The 158 Attorney General may bring action to obtain any appropriate 159 relief. 160 Section 3.âPresent subsection (4) of section 366.06, 161 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), and a new 162 subsection (4) is added to that section, to read: 163 366.06âRates; procedure for fixing and changing.â 164 (4)âThe commission shall ensure that the allowable return 165 on equity for public utilities does not exceed the national 166 average authorized return on equity for comparable public 167 utilities across the country. 168 Section 4.âSection 366.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to 169 read: 170 366.07âRates; adjustment.â 171 (1)âWhenever the commission, after public hearing either 172 upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that any of shall 173 find the rates, rentals, charges, or classifications, or any of 174 them, proposed, demanded, observed, charged, or collected by any 175 public utility for any service, or in connection therewith, or 176 any of the rules, regulations, measurements, practices, or 177 contracts, or any of them, relating thereto, are unjust, 178 unreasonable, insufficient, excessive, or unjustly 179 discriminatory or preferential, or in anywise in violation of 180 law, or any service is inadequate or cannot be obtained, the 181 commission shall determine and by order fix the fair and 182 reasonable rates, rentals, charges, or classifications, and 183 reasonable rules, regulations, measurements, practices, 184 contracts, or service, to be imposed, observed, furnished, or 185 followed in the future. 186 (2)âAny form of cost-tracking mechanism for a public 187 utility to recover electricity supply costs must provide for a 188 sharing of those costs whereby customers are responsible for not 189 more than 80 percent of any cost and the public utility is 190 responsible for not less than 20 percent of any cost, in 191 accordance with s. 366.81(4)(a), (b) and (c). 192 Section 5.âSection 366.81, Florida Statutes, is amended to 193 read: 194 366.81âLegislative findings and intent.â 195 (1)âThe Legislature finds and declares that it is critical 196 to use utilize the most efficient and cost-effective demand-side 197 renewable energy systems and conservation systems in order to 198 protect the health, prosperity, and general welfare of the state 199 and its citizens. Reduction in, and control of, the growth rates 200 of electric consumption and of weather-sensitive peak demand are 201 of particular importance. 202 (2)âThe Legislature further finds that the Florida Public 203 Service Commission is the appropriate agency to adopt goals and 204 approve plans related to the promotion of demand-side renewable 205 energy systems and the conservation of electric energy and 206 natural gas usage. 207 (3)âThe Legislature directs the commission to develop and 208 adopt overall goals, and authorizes the commission to require 209 each utility to develop plans and implement programs for 210 increasing energy efficiency and conservation and demand-side 211 renewable energy systems within its service area, subject to the 212 approval of the commission. 213 (4)âThe Legislature directs the commission to develop and 214 adopt performance- and incentive-based rules, multiyear rate 215 plans, and other regulatory mechanisms, to achieve fair, just, 216 reasonable, and sufficient rates for electric utilities. The 217 rules must: 218 (a)âAlign the financial incentives of an electric utility 219 with the interests of the utilityâs customers regarding incurred 220 fuel costs; 221 (b)âProtect customers from the volatility of fuel costs and 222 improve an electric utilityâs management of fuel costs; 223 (c)âEnsure that the electric utilities provide their 224 rationale for the metrics used to establish fuel costs; 225 (d)âEstablish performance incentives and penalty mechanisms 226 that link an electric utilityâs return on equity to the 227 achievement of performance metrics related to energy efficiency, 228 grid reliability, and cost effectiveness; 229 (e)âRequire reduction of an electric utilityâs return on 230 equity by 10 basis points per percent deviation upon such 231 utilityâs failure to operate within a 10 percent margin of the 232 annual national average for electricity consumption, as measured 233 by the United States Energy Information Administration, through 234 energy cost efficiency; and 235 (f)âProvide guidelines for a 50-50 debt-to-equity ratio 236 structure for electric utilities. 237 (5)âSince solutions to this stateâs our energy problems are 238 complex, the Legislature intends that the use of solar energy, 239 renewable energy sources, highly efficient systems, 240 cogeneration, and load-control systems be encouraged. 241 Accordingly, in exercising its jurisdiction, the commission may 242 shall not approve any rate or rate structure which discriminates 243 against any class of customers on account of the use of such 244 facilities, systems, or devices. 245 (6)âThis expression of legislative intent may shall not be 246 construed to preclude experimental rates, rate structures, or 247 programs. 248 (7)âThe Legislature further finds and declares that ss. 249 366.80-366.83 and 403.519 must are to be liberally construed in 250 order to meet the complex problems of reducing and controlling 251 the growth rates of electric consumption and reducing the growth 252 rates of weather-sensitive peak demand; increasing the overall 253 efficiency and cost-effectiveness of electricity and natural gas 254 production and use; encouraging further development of demand 255 side renewable energy systems; and conserving expensive 256 resources, particularly petroleum fuels. 257 Section 6.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 258 377.814, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 259 377.814âMunicipal Solid Waste-to-Energy Program.â 260 (5)âFUNDING.â 261 (b)âFunds awarded under the grant programs set forth in 262 this section may not be used to support, subsidize, or enable 263 the sale of electric power generated by a municipal solid waste 264 to-energy facility to any small electric utility eligible to 265 petition the commission under s. 366.06(5) s. 366.06(4). 266 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.